Utah statutes.
48-1d-603.   Transfer of transferable interest.

(1)  A transfer, in whole or in part, of a transferable interest:

(a)  is permissible;

(b)  does not by itself cause a person's dissociation or a dissolution and winding up of the partnership's activities and affairs; and

(c)  subject to Section 48-1d-605, does not entitle the transferee to:

(i)  participate in the management or conduct of the partnership's activities and affairs; or

(ii)  except as otherwise provided in Subsection (3), have access to records or other information concerning the partnership's activities and affairs.

(2)  A transferee has the right to:

(a)  receive, in accordance with the transfer, distributions to which the transferor would otherwise be entitled; and

(b)  seek under Subsection 48-1d-901(5) a judicial determination that it is equitable to wind up the partnership's activities and affairs.

(3)  In a dissolution and winding up of a partnership, a transferee is entitled to an account of the partnership's transactions only from the date of the last account agreed to by the partners.

(4)  A partnership need not give effect to a transferee's rights under this section until the partnership knows or has notice of the transfer.

(5)  A transfer of a transferable interest in violation of a restriction on transfer contained in the partnership agreement is ineffective as to a person having knowledge or notice of the restriction at the time of transfer.

(6)  Except as otherwise provided in Subsection 48-1d-701(4)(b), if a partner transfers a transferable interest, the transferor retains the rights of a partner other than the transferable interest transferred and retains all duties and obligations of a partner.

(7)  If a partner transfers a transferable interest to a person that becomes a partner with respect to the transferred interest, the transferee is liable for the transferor's obligations under Sections 48-1d-502 and 48-1d-505 known to the transferee when the transferee becomes a partner.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

